Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-128
Adjutant General; seal.

The Adjutant General shall provide a seal, which shall be the seal of his office, and shall be delivered by him to his successor.

Laws 1917, c. 205, § 4, p. 485;

Laws 1919, c. 121, § 2, p. 290;

Laws 1921, c. 234, § 1, p. 834;

C.S.1922, § 3305;

C.S.1929, § 55-125;

R.S.1943, § 55-147;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 26, p. 1590.